tests/st.yaml
Config:
     hfst:
         App: hfst-lookup
         Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
         Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] random stuff with -ст-":
    август<n><abl> : августан 
    август<n><gen> : августуң 
    август<n><loc> : августа 
    автомобилист<n><pl><gen> : автомобилистерниң 
    автомобилист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : автомобилистериниң 
    альпинист<n><pl><gen> : альпинистерниң 
    альпинист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : альпинистериниң 
    альпинист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : альпинистери 
    артист<n><acc> : артисти 
    артист<n><dat> : артиске 
    артист<n><gen> : артистиң 
    артист<n><pl><abl> : артистерден 
    артист<n><pl><acc> : артистерни 
    артист<n><pl><dat> : артистерге 
    артист<n><pl><gen> : артистерниң 
    артист<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : артистеривисти 
    артист<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : артистеривиске 
    артист<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : артистеривистиң 
    артист<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : артистеривис 
    артист<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : артистеримге 
    артист<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : артистерим 
    артист<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : артистериңерни 
    артист<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : артистеринден 
    артист<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : артистерин 
    артист<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : артистеринге 
    артист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : артистериниң 
    артист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : артистери 
    артист<n><px1pl><acc> : артизивисти 
    артист<n><px1pl><gen> : артизивистиң 
    артист<n><px1pl><nom> : артизивис 
    артист<n><px3sp><dat> : артизинге 
    артист<n><px3sp><nom> : артизи 
    баянист<n><gen> : баянистиң 
    буддист<n><pl><dat> : буддистерге 
    буддист<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : буддистеринге 
    буддист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : буддистериниң 
    буддист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : буддистери 
    журналист<n><acc> : журналисти 
    журналист<n><dat> : журналиске 
    журналист<n><gen> : журналистиң 
    журналист<n><pl><abl> : журналистерден 
    журналист<n><pl><acc> : журналистерни 
    журналист<n><pl><dat> : журналистерге 
    журналист<n><pl><gen> : журналистерниң 
    журналист<n><pl><loc> : журналистерде 
    журналист<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : журналистеривиске 
    журналист<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : журналистеривистиң 
    журналист<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : журналистериңер 
    журналист<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : журналистерин 
    журналист<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : журналистеринге 
    журналист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : журналистериниң 
    журналист<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : журналистеринде 
    журналист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : журналистери 
    журналист<n><px2pl><nom> : журнализиңер 
    журналист<n><px3sp><gen> : журнализиниң 
    журналист<n><px3sp><nom> : журнализи 
    коммунист<n><dat> : коммуниске 
    коммунист<n><gen> : коммунистиң 
    коммунист<n><pl><gen> : коммунистерниң 
    коммунист<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : коммунистерин 
    коммунист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : коммунистериниң 
    коммунист<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : коммунистеринде 
    коммунист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : коммунистери 
    машинист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : машинистери 
    машинист<n><px3sp><nom> : машинизи 
    методист<n><px3sp><nom> : методизи 
    парашютист<n><pl><acc> : парашютистерни 
    радиожурналист<n><gen> : радиожурналистиң 
    солист<n><pl><acc> : солистерни 
    солист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : солистериниң 
    солист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : солистери 
    солист<n><px3sp><nom> : солизи 
    специалист<n><acc> : специалисти 
    специалист<n><dat> : специалиске 
    специалист<n><gen> : специалистиң 
    специалист<n><pl><abl> : специалистерден 
    специалист<n><pl><acc> : специалистерни 
    специалист<n><pl><all> : специалистерже 
    специалист<n><pl><dat> : специалистерге 
    специалист<n><pl><gen> : специалистерниң 
    специалист<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : специалистеривис 
    специалист<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : специалистеринден 
    специалист<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : специалистерин 
    специалист<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : специалистеринге 
    специалист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : специалистериниң 
    специалист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : специалистери 
    специалист<n><px1pl><nom> : специализивис 
    специалист<n><px3sp><acc> : специализин 
    специалист<n><px3sp><dat> : специализинге 
    специалист<n><px3sp><gen> : специализиниң 
    специалист<n><px3sp><nom> : специализи 
    сценарист<n><px3sp><nom> : сценаризи 
    танкист<n><acc> : танкисти 
    танкист<n><pl><px1pl><gen> : танкистеривистиң 
    танкист<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : танкистеривис 
    танкист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : танкистери 
    тележурналист<n><pl><gen> : тележурналистерниң 
    телефонист<n><pl><acc> : телефонистерни 
    тракторист<n><pl><dat> : трактористерге 
    тракторист<n><pl><gen> : трактористерниң 
    тракторист<n><px3sp><abl> : тракторизинден 
    тракторист<n><px3sp><nom> : тракторизи 
    турист<n><gen> : туристиң 
    турист<n><pl><acc> : туристерни 
    турист<n><pl><dat> : туристерге 
    турист<n><pl><gen> : туристерниң 
    турист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : туристериниң 
    турист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : туристери 
    үс<n><abl> : үстен 
    үс<n><acc> : үстү 
    үс<n><dat> : үске 
    үс<n><px1sg><nom> : үзүм 
    үс<n><px3sp><acc> : үзүн 
    үс<n><px3sp><dat> : үзүнге 
    үс<n><px3sp><gen> : үзүнүң 
    үс<n><px3sp><nom> : үзү 
    үстүү<adj> : үстүү 
    фашист<n><acc> : фашисти 
    фашист<n><pl><abl> : фашистерден 
    фашист<n><pl><acc> : фашистерни 
    фашист<n><pl><all> : фашистерже 
    фашист<n><pl><dat> : фашистерге 
    фашист<n><pl><gen> : фашистерниң 
    фашист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : фашистери 
    футболист<n><pl><acc> : футболистерни 
    футболист<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : футболистериниң 
    экономист<n><gen> : экономистиң 
    экономист<n><px3sp><nom> : экономизи 
    этность<n><acc> : этносту 
    этность<n><gen> : этностуң 
    юрист<n><gen> : юристиң 
    юрист<n><pl><dat> : юристерге 
    юрист<n><pl><gen> : юристерниң 
    юрист<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : юристеривис 
    юрист<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : юристерин 
    юрист<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : юристери 
    юрист<n><px3sp><nom> : юризи 
